lib/dict/pl_PL.aff
SFX f Y 48
SFX f   a         i         [^jk³nrtw]a
SFX f   a         0         ja
SFX f   ka        ek        [^s]ka
SFX f   a         0         ska
SFX f   ³a        e³        ³a
SFX f   na        en        na
SFX f   obra      óbr       obra
SFX f   a         0         ora
SFX f   a         0         [^êo]ta
SFX f   ota       ót        ota
SFX f   êta       ±t        êta
SFX f   wa        ew        rwa
SFX f   a         0         twa
SFX f   e         y         [^cijl]e
SFX f   ce        ec        [^e]lce
SFX f   e         0         elce
SFX f   ce        iec       pce
SFX f   e         0         [aiy]ce
SFX f   ce        iec       wce
SFX f   e         i         [^bcnpz]ie
SFX f   e         0         [bcpz]ie
SFX f   e         0         nie
SFX f   nie       ñ         anie
SFX f   e         i         [^aeioy]je
SFX f   je        i         [aeo]je
SFX f   e         0         [iy]je
SFX f   e         i         le
SFX f   i         0         gi
SFX f   ki        ek        [^æêiño¶uy¼]ki
SFX f   æki       ciek      æki
SFX f   i         0         [êiouy]ki
SFX f   ñki       niek      ñki
SFX f   y         0         [^bcd³tw]y
SFX f   y         0         [^ê]by
SFX f   êby       ±b        êby
SFX f   cy        iec       cy
SFX f   y         0         [^o]dy
SFX f   y         0         [^w]ody
SFX f   ody       ód        wody
SFX f   y         0         [auy]³y
SFX f   ³y        e³        [dr]³y
SFX f   o³y       ó³        do³y
SFX f   y         0         so³y
SFX f   y         0         [^o]ty
SFX f   y         0         [^b]oty
SFX f   oty       ót        boty
SFX f   y         0         [^o]wy
SFX f   owy       ów        owy
